Wyoming statutes. Title 8 General Provisions
Article 1. Statutes, Supplements and Session Laws

§ 8-2-101.
Distribution of statutes, supplements and session laws.

Statutes, supplements and session laws shall be distributed as provided by contract with the publisher or as directed by the management council, to the following, without charge:

Nine (9) copies to the county clerk of each county in Wyoming, for use in the county offices and the district court, plus one (1) additional copy for each magistrate serving pursuant to W.S.

5-9-206

and circuit judge in each county;

One (1) copy to each member of the Wyoming legislature;

One (1) copy to the office of each United States senator and the congressman from Wyoming;

One (1) copy to each judge of the district court of Wyoming;

One (1) copy to each justice of the Wyoming supreme court;

One (1) copy to each of the five (5) elected state officers;

One (1) copy each to the house and senate chief clerks; and

One (1) copy to the principal county library in each county for use therein.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, all copies of the statutes, supplements and session laws shall be sold and distributed by the publisher as contracted for by the management council.

Except for the distribution of sets of the Wyoming statutes to newly elected legislators, the distribution provided by subsection (a) of this section applies to statutes, supplements and session laws published hereafter, and does not require the distribution of additional free copies of publications already distributed.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 39, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 8-15; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-215; Laws 1978, ch. 20, § 1; ch. 37, § 3; 1981, ch. 71, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2001, ch. 164, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to exchange of session laws, see §

5-2-502

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(i), deleted “justice of the peace” following “additional copy for each.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.